vi: Giống cà rốt: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Cà rốt tím; Hỗn hợp cầu vồng; Khác
cs: Odrůda mrkve: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Purpurová; Duhový mix; Jiné
hu: Sárgarépafajta: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; purple; Szivárvány mix; Egyéb
sk-SK: Odroda mrkvy: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Purple; Rainbow mix; Iné
fr: Variété de carottes: Boléro; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold Nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantaise; Violet; Mélange arc-en-ciel; Autre
zh-TW: 胡蘿蔔品種: 波萊羅; 香特奈; 丹弗斯; 金塊; 皇帝; 黑田; 南特; 紫色; 彩虹混合; 其他
da: Gulerodssort: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Guldklump; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Lilla; Regnbue-mix; Andet
it: Varietà di carota: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperatore; Kuroda; Nantes; Viola; Mix arcobaleno; Altro
th: สายพันธุ์แครอท: โบเลโร; ชองเตอเน; แดนเวอร์; โกลด์นักเก็ต; อิมเพอเรเตอร์; คุโรดะ; น็องต์; สีม่วง; คละสี; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 胡萝卜品种: Bolero 品种; Chantenay 品种; Danvers 品种; 金块; Imperator 品种; 黑田品种; Nantes 品种; 紫色; 彩虹混合; 其他
hr-HR: Sorta mrkve: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold Nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Ljubičasta; Mješavina boja; Ostalo
nb: Gulrotvariant: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Lilla; Regnbuemiks; Annet
ro-RO: Varietate de morcov: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Mov; Mix Rainbow; Altele
pt-PT: Variedade de cenoura: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Roxa; Mistura arco-íris; Outra
ru: Сорт моркови: Болеро; Шантенэ; Данверс; Голд наггет; Император; Курода; Нантская; Фиолетовая; Радужный микс; Другое
sl-SI: Sorta korenja: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Vijolično; Mavrična mešanica; Drugo
pt-BR: Variedade de cenoura: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold Nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Roxo; Mix arco-íris; Outro
pl: Odmiana marchwi: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold Nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantejska; Fioletowa; Mieszanka Rainbow (Rainbow mix); Inne
nl: Wortel ras: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Paars; Regenboogmix; Overige
tr: Havuç çeşidi: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Mor; Gökkuşağı karışımı; Diğer
el: Ποικιλία καρότου: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Μοβ; Πολύχρωμα (Rainbow mix); Άλλο
ja: ニンジンの種類: ボレロ; シャンテネー; ダンバース; ゴールドナゲット; インペレーター; クロダ; ナンテス; 紫; レインボーミックス; その他
en: Carrot variety: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Purple; Rainbow mix; Other
fi: Porkkanalajike: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Violetti; Sateenkaarisekoitus; Muu
de: Karottensorte: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold Nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Lila; Regenbogen-Mix; Sonstige
sv: Morotssort: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Lila; Regnbågsmix; Annat
ko: 당근 품종: 볼레로; 샹트네; 댄버스; 골드 너겟; 임페라터; 쿠로다; 낭트; 보라색; 레인보우 믹스; 기타
lt-LT: Morkų veislė: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nanto; Violetinė; Vaivorykštinis mišinys; Kita
es: Variedad de zanahoria: Bolero; Chantenay; Danvers; Gold nugget; Imperator; Kuroda; Nantes; Morada; Mezcla arcoíris; Otro
bg-BG: Сорт моркови: Болеро; Шантене; Данвърс; Голд нъгет; Император; Курода; Нант; Лилави; Микс цветове; Друго